Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 7
DISSOLUTION

32-1-701. Initiation - petition - procedure.

Whenever the majority of all the members of the board of a special district deems it to be in the best interests of such district that it be dissolved, the board shall file a petition for dissolution with the court.

The board, promptly and in good faith, shall also take the necessary steps to dissolve the special district whenever the lesser of five percent of the eligible electors or two hundred fifty eligible electors or, in case of special districts larger than twenty-five thousand persons, three percent of the eligible electors of the district or the division file an application with the board to dissolve the special district pursuant to the provisions of this part 7. In that case the board shall file a petition for dissolution with the court within sixty days after the date of filing of the application by the eligible electors. The petition for dissolution shall request an election and shall include a report on the steps which have been taken to comply with the requirements of section 32-1-702. The board, at the time it files a petition for dissolution pursuant to this subsection (2), may request that the proceedings under sections 32-1-703 and 32-1-704 be continued until further progress has been made in complying with the requirements of section 32-1-702.

No application to dissolve a special district shall be circulated until it has been approved as following as nearly practicable the requirements of section 31-11-106, C.R.S., for municipal petitions. The application shall be submitted to the secretary of the board of directors of the special district. The secretary shall approve the application as to form or notify the person who submitted the application of any deficiencies in the form of the application by the close of the fifteenth business day following the submission of such application. The secretary shall mail written notice of the approval or deficiencies to the person who submitted the application within two days after the date the action is taken.

Any signature that is affixed to an application to dissolve a special district prior to the date that the written approval notice is mailed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be invalid.

No application to dissolve a special district filed by the eligible electors in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be accepted by the board of directors of such district more than ninety days after the date that the written approval notice is mailed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

If at least eighty-five percent of the territory encompassed by a special district lies within the corporate limits of a municipality, the governing body of such municipality may file an application with the board to dissolve the special district, and the board, promptly and in good faith, shall take the necessary steps to dissolve such district in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(3.5) If the territory encompassed by a special district lies wholly within the boundaries of a county, the board of county commissioners of any such county may file an application with the special district's board of directors to dissolve the special district, and the special district's board of directors, promptly and in good faith, shall take the necessary steps to dissolve the district in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section; except that, if more than eighty-five percent of the territory encompassed by the special district lies within the corporate limits of one or more municipalities, the special district's board of directors shall not take any action on the application unless the governing bodies of all such municipalities have consented to or joined the application.

(3.7) If the territory encompassed by a special district lies within the boundaries of two or more counties, the board of county commissioners of each of the counties may jointly file an application with the special district's board of directors to dissolve the special district, and the special district's board of directors, promptly and in good faith, shall take the necessary steps to dissolve the district in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section; except that, if more than eighty-five percent of the territory encompassed by the special district lies within the corporate limits of one or more municipalities, the special district's board of directors shall not take any action on the application unless the governing bodies of all such municipalities have consented to or joined the application. The application must include the consent of such counties to assume the responsibilities for providing the services that had been provided by the special district in their respective jurisdictions or evidence of an agreement to provide the services on a contractual basis.

If the territory encompassed by a special district lies wholly within the boundaries of a regional service authority and if such service authority provides the same service as that provided by the special district, the board of directors of any such service authority may file an application with the board to dissolve the special district, and the board, promptly and in good faith, shall take the necessary steps to dissolve such district in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section.

If the territory encompassed by a special district lies within the boundaries of two or more regional service authorities and if such service authorities provide the same service as that provided by the special district, the two or more service authorities may file jointly an application with the board to dissolve the special district, and the board, promptly and in good faith, shall take the necessary steps to dissolve such district in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section. The application must include the consent of such service authorities to assume the responsibilities for providing the service in their respective jurisdictions or the consent of one regional service authority to provide the service on a contractual basis.

Any application filed with the board to dissolve a special district under subsection (2), (3), (3.5), (3.7), (4), or (5) of this section must be accompanied by a cash bond in the amount of three hundred dollars to cover the expenses connected with the proceedings if the dissolution is not effected.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1568, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1236, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 788, § 14, effective June 4.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 882, § 117, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 448, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2022:

(3.5) and (3.7) added and (5) and (6) amended, (HB 22-1097), ch. 31, p. 176, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-603 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-702. Requirements for dissolution petition.

A petition for dissolution must generally describe the territory embraced in the special district, must have a map showing the special district, a current financial statement of the special district, and a plan for final disposition of the assets of the special district and for payment of the financial obligations of the special district, must state whether or not the services of the special district are to be continued and, if so, by what means, and must state whether the existing board or a portion thereof is to continue in office, subject to court appointment to fill vacancies. Said petition may provide for the regional service authority board, the board of county commissioners, or the governing body of the municipality to act as the board in accordance with section 32-1-707.

The special district's current financial statement shall be accompanied by adequate evidence of compliance with the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

The petition for dissolution shall provide for one of the following:

A certificate that the special district has no financial obligations or outstanding bonds;

A plan for dissolution stating that there are financial obligations or outstanding bonds but that the special district will not continue in existence and specifically providing that funds or securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., will be placed in escrow, prior to dissolution, in a state or national bank within this state having trust powers and which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation and stating that such funds or securities will be sufficient for the payment of the financial obligations and outstanding bonds and all expenses relating thereto, including charges of any escrow agent;

A plan for dissolution stating that there are financial obligations or outstanding bonds and specifically providing that the special district will continue in existence to such extent as is necessary to adequately provide for the payment of such financial obligations and outstanding bonds.

The petition for dissolution shall also provide for one of the following:

A statement that the services of the special district will not be continued within such district;

A plan for dissolution specifically providing that services are to be continued within the special district by one or more regional service authorities, municipalities, counties, intergovernmental authorities formed and operated under part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., or other special districts, or any combination thereof, and incorporating an agreement with such regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority, or other special district, or any combination thereof, under which responsibility for all services presently provided by the special district will be assumed by such entity. Such agreement shall provide for the operation and maintenance of the system or facilities of the special district by the regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority, or other special district, provisions for service, rates, and charges, and, if applicable, provisions concerning acquisition of the special district's system or facilities, consolidation or inclusion of territory, and procedures for contract modification, employee rights, and retirement benefits. Such agreement may include provisions for certification of levies by the special district continuing in existence under paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section, the contracting regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority, or other special district providing the services. Any agreement concerning fire protection districts entered into pursuant to this subsection (4) shall include provisions for the continuation of paid employees' rights pursuant to section 32-1-1002 (2) and the retirement benefits of paid firefighters as provided in parts 2 and 4 of article 30.5 and article 31 of title 31, C.R.S., and the retirement benefits of volunteer firefighters under part 11 of article 30 of title 31, C.R.S.

If a portion of a special district is located within the boundaries of a municipality and a dissolution proceeding has been initiated by the special district, the board shall hold a public hearing for residents in the unincorporated area of the special district to express their views concerning the provision of services to the unincorporated portions of the special district at the time of negotiation of the agreement or any modification thereof.

Any plan for dissolution shall include adequate provision for continuance of existing services, and the financing thereof, to all areas of the special district being dissolved if such services are essential for the health, welfare, and safety of those residents of the special district being dissolved.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1569, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1116, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4)(b)(I) amended, p. 796, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 95:

(4)(b)(I) amended, p. 1385, § 18, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(4)(b)(I) amended, p. 942, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1097), ch. 31, p. 177, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-604 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending subsection (4)(b)(I), see section 1 of chapter 254, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

32-1-703. Notice of filing petition.

Upon filing of the petition for dissolution by the board with the court, the court shall give notice by publication reciting the fact that a petition for dissolution has been filed and reciting the applicable financial provision set forth under section 32-1-702 (3) and the applicable service provision set forth under section 32-1-702 (4).

Such notice shall specify the time and place of a hearing, to be held within fifty days after filing of said petition, and shall provide that any interested party may appear and be heard on the sufficiency of the petition for dissolution or on the adequacy of the applicable financial and service provisions.

The court shall also forthwith cause a copy of said notice to be mailed to the board of county commissioners of each county having territory within the special district and to the governing body of each municipality having territory located within a radius of three miles of the special district boundaries.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1570, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 32-1-605 and 32-3-125 as they existed prior to 1981.

32-1-704. Conditions necessary for dissolution - permissible provisions - hearings - court powers.

Prior to the court hearing on the petition for dissolution, the governing body of any municipality, county, intergovernmental authority formed and operated under part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., other special district, or regional service authority which is a party to an agreement to render services and which is assuming the responsibility to provide those services in the special district to be dissolved shall submit to the jurisdiction of the court by a written entry of appearance.

Hearings may be continued by the court on the petition for dissolution as necessary to complete the proceedings authorized by this part 7. No petition shall be declared void on account of alleged defects, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory or in any other particular.

Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (3), if the court finds that the special district has no financial obligations or outstanding bonds or that the special district's financial obligations and outstanding bonds will be adequately provided for prior to dissolution by means of escrow funds or securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., to secure payment thereof, that the petition for dissolution meets the requirements of this part 7, and that an adequate plan exists for continuation of services, if required, the court shall order an election in the special district on the question of dissolution.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (3)(c) of this section, the court shall enter an order dissolving the special district pursuant to section 32-1-707 without an election if the special district lies wholly within the corporate limits of the municipality, if the special district has no financial obligations or outstanding bonds, and if the special district board and the governing body of the municipality consent to the dissolution.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (3)(c) of this section, the court shall enter an order dissolving the special district pursuant to section 32-1-707 without an election if the special district lies wholly within the county, if the special district has no financial obligations or outstanding bonds, and if the special district board and the board of county commissioners consent to the dissolution, and, if more than eighty-five percent of the territory encompassed by the special district lies within the corporate limits of one or more municipalities, the governing bodies of all such municipalities also consent to the dissolution.

If, at the court hearing on the petition for dissolution, the lesser of ten percent or one hundred of the eligible electors of the special district petition the court for a special election to be held on the question of dissolution of the special district, the court shall order an election in the special district on the question of dissolution.

If the court finds the special district has financial obligations or outstanding bonds and no escrow plan, the court shall determine whether the plan for dissolution, as submitted, adequately provides for payment of the financial obligations and outstanding bonds of the special district.

If the court determines that the plan for dissolution adequately provides for the payment of the financial obligations and outstanding bonds of the special district, that the petition for dissolution meets the requirements of this part 7, and that an adequate plan exists for continuance of services, if required, the court shall order an election to be held in the special district on the question of dissolution.

If, at any time after the filing of a petition for dissolution under section 32-1-701, the court determines that no agreement can be reached concerning the plan for dissolution under section 32-1-702 (4)(b) or that any other requirements of this part 7 cannot be met, and that the board has acted in good faith, it shall dismiss the dissolution proceedings. If, however, the special district is entirely within the municipality and the parties are unable to reach an agreement, the court may impose a plan for dissolution under section 32-1-702 at the request of either the municipality or the special district and shall order an election to be held in the special district on the question of dissolution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1570, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1117, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 797, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 92:

(3)(c) amended, p. 883, § 118, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2022:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1097), ch. 31, p. 177, § 3, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-606 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-705. Election notice.

When an election is ordered by the court, the court shall give notice pursuant to section 1-13.5-510, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1571, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 883, § 119, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1439, § 135, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 787, § 87, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-607 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-706. Conduct of election.

It is the duty of the secretary to administer the election, subject to court supervision. The election shall be conducted pursuant to article 13.5 of title 1.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1571, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 883, § 120, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 787, § 88, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 542, § 13, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-608 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-707. Order of dissolution - conditions attached.

If a majority of the eligible electors voting at the election approve the question of dissolution, the judge shall enter an order dissolving the special district for all purposes or for all purposes except those reserved in the plan, as the case may be.

The order of dissolution shall:

State that there are no financial obligations or outstanding bonds or that any such financial obligations or outstanding bonds are adequately secured by escrow funds or securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

If the special district has financial obligations or outstanding bonds, incorporate the applicable financial provisions of the findings of the court accepting the plan for dissolution entered into pursuant to section 32-1-704 (4);

Incorporate the applicable service provisions of the findings of the court accepting the plan for dissolution entered into pursuant to section 32-1-704 (3) or (4).

Whenever the special district will continue in existence pursuant to the provisions of section 32-1-702 (3)(c), the court may provide that all or certain directors of the board of the special district being dissolved remain in office to perform duties pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The remaining directors of the board shall not be subject to election. Any vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment by the court.

If a portion of the special district being dissolved lies outside the contracting regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority formed and operated under part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., or other special district providing the services, the court, from time to time, shall appoint directors to the board so that proportionate representation is provided, taking into account the size, population, and valuation for assessment within and without the regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority, or other special district.

If the special district being dissolved lies entirely within the corporate limits of a municipality and such municipality is providing the same services within the area of the special district being dissolved, the court shall order that the governing body of such municipality shall serve as the board of the special district to perform the duties specified in this section.

If the special district is to continue in existence for the purpose of the payment of financial obligations or outstanding bonds, the order of dissolution shall provide that:

The board shall be responsible for setting rates, tolls, fees, or charges and certifying to the board of county commissioners the amount of revenue to be raised by the annual mill levy of the special district necessary for payment of the special district's financial obligations and outstanding bonds; and

The contracting regional service authority, municipality, county, intergovernmental authority formed and operated under part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., or other special district providing the services shall be responsible for fixing the rates, tolls, fees, or charges needed to finance the services being provided pursuant to the provisions of section 32-1-702 (4)(b).

In any case in which an agreement has been made for continuation of services within the special district pursuant to the provisions of section 32-1-702 (4)(b), the court may authorize the board to continue in existence for the purpose of assuring the performance of any condition of such agreement, including negotiations relating to any future modifications of the agreement, procedures for which are provided in the original agreement for services.

The court's order may in such case specify that its jurisdiction over the dissolution continues for the purpose of considering any future modifications of the agreement or other questions concerned with performance of the agreement.

A certified copy of the order of dissolution shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county or counties in which the special district is located and with the division by the clerk of the court. The costs of such filing shall be paid with remaining funds of the district. If there are no remaining funds of the district, the division may claim the exemption from payment of recording fees imposed in section 30-1-103, C.R.S., at the time the copy of the order is filed for recording.

The order of dissolution shall be final and conclusive against all persons; except that an action may be instituted by the state of Colorado in the nature of quo warranto commenced within thirty-five days after the order of dissolution. The dissolution of said district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this subsection (6).

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1572, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1117, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b) and (3)(b) amended, p. 797, § 3, effective April 10.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 883, § 121, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2012:

(6) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 882, § 148, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(5) amended, (HB 14-1073), ch. 30, p. 177, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 32-1-609 and 32-1-611 as they existed prior to 1981.

32-1-708. Disposition of remaining funds - unpaid tax or levies.

If services are to be continued within the special district, all funds remaining in the treasury of such special district in excess of all financial obligations and outstanding bonds shall be utilized, upon completion of the requirements for dissolution, to reduce the rates, tolls, fees, and charges fixed by the contracting municipality, county, intergovernmental authority formed and operated under part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., other special district, or regional service authority to finance the services continued in the special district. If services are not to be continued within the special district, such funds shall be divided among the municipalities and counties in which the special district is located, pro rata, as the valuation for assessment of taxable property in the parts of the special district lying in each municipality and unincorporated portions of each county bears to the total valuation for assessment of the taxable property of the special district as determined by the respective county assessors for the preceding tax year.

All outstanding and unpaid tax sales and levies of a dissolved special district shall be valid and remain a lien against the property against which they are assessed or levied until paid, subject, however, to the limitations of liens of tax certificates and of certificates of purchase provided by general law. The board of county commissioners has the same power to enforce the collection of all outstanding tax sales of the special district as the special district would have had if it had not been dissolved. Taxes paid or collected after dissolution shall be distributed in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1573, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 797, § 4, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-612 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-709. Dissolution of health service district - limitation.

Any health service district organized pursuant to part 3 of this article may be dissolved in the manner provided in this part 7, but no such health service district shall be dissolved within a one-year period from the date of the entry of an order declaring said district organized or one year from the date of final determination of any petition to set aside such order, whichever date is later.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1574, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 474, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-5-215 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-710. Dissolution by administrative action.

The division shall notify a special district by certified mail of the division's intent to certify the district dissolved if:

Except as provided in section 32-1-905 (2.5), the district has failed to hold or properly cancel an election pursuant to this article;

The district has failed to adopt a budget, pursuant to section 29-1-108, C.R.S., for two consecutive years;

The district has failed to comply with part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., for two consecutive years; or

The district has not provided or attempted to provide any of the services or facilities for which the district was organized for two consecutive years; and

The district has no outstanding financial obligations.

The division may declare the special district dissolved if, within thirty days of the notice provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the district has failed to demonstrate to the division that the district has performed such statutory or service responsibility or will proceed to perform such responsibilities within a time period agreed to by the division and the district.

If the district has failed to hold or properly cancel an election, no board has been appointed pursuant to section 32-1-905 (2.5), and there will be no interruption of services being provided by the district, it shall be presumed that the district has failed to demonstrate to the division that it has performed its statutory or service responsibility or will proceed to perform such responsibilities.

Following the division's declaration of dissolution, the division shall submit the declaration to the court for certification of the district's dissolution. The court shall make a determination on the division's declaration within thirty days after the declaration has been submitted and shall order the disposition of the assets, if any, of the district in accordance with section 32-1-708. In the event that the court determines that the district is not inactive, it may terminate the dissolution proceeding. The division shall give notice that it has applied to the court for certification of the declaration of dissolution to the following parties: The county clerk and recorder, the board of county commissioners, and the assessor of each county in which the district is located; the governing body of any municipality in which the special district is located; and the special district.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1021, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a)(I) and (2) amended, p. 1237, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 90:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 1436, § 4, effective January 1, 1991.